Louisiana, session 2026, SB477.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:164(A)(3) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 11:411(16)
is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§164. Part-time public officials
A. Except as provided in Subsection B of this Section, the following elected
or appointed officials are hereby deemed to be part-time public servants who, based
on such part-time service, shall not participate in, or receive credit for service in, any
public retirement system, fund, or plan sponsored by the state of Louisiana or any
instrumentality or political subdivision thereof:
* * *
(3) Any member of a board or commission established by the state of
Louisiana or any instrumentality or political subdivision thereof unless authorized
by law enacted by two-thirds of the elected members of each house.
* * *
§411. Eligibility for membership
The membership of this system shall be as follows:
* * *
(16) The chairman of the Louisiana Gaming Control Board, appointed
and employed in such position on or after July 1, 2024.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 477 ENROLLED
Section 2. R.S. 27:14(B)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§14. Compensation
* * *
B.(1) * * *
(2) The chairman of the board shall devote full time to his duties as chairman
and shall not engage in any other business or profession. During such service, the
chairman shall not earn compensation of any kind other than his salary paid as a
board member. The chairman shall be considered a full-time employee of the state.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the chairman shall
be eligible for membership in the Louisiana State Employees' Retirement
System and shall not earn compensation of any kind other than that of an
adjunct professor and receive an annual salary equal in amount to that of a judge
of the courts of appeal of this state, as provided in R.S. 13:311 which amount shall
include expenses, benefits, emoluments, and any supplemental pay to which
such judges are entitled.
* * *
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.